Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska57-910.08
Unit or cooperative development; division orders; no termination by commission.

No division order or other contract relating to the sale or purchase of production from a separately owned tract shall be terminated by any commission order, but shall remain in force and apply to oil and gas allocated to such tract until terminated in accordance with the provisions thereof.

Laws 1965, c. 343, § 9, p. 980.